nl: Watermatras constructie: Hardside; Hybride; Semi-hardside; Softside; Overige
vi: Cấu trúc đệm nước: Viền cứng; Hỗn hợp; Viền bán cứng; Viền mềm; Khác
ja: ウォーターマットレス構造: ハードサイド; ハイブリッド; セミハードサイド; ソフトサイド; その他
en: Water mattress construction: Hardside; Hybrid; Semi-hardside; Softside; Other
ko: 워터 매트리스 구조: 하드사이드; 하이브리드; 세미 하드사이드; 소프트사이드; 기타
hr-HR: Izrada vodenih madraca: Tvrdi rubovi; Hibridno; Polutvrdi rubovi; Mekani rubovi; Ostalo
pt-PT: Construção do colchão de água: Estrutura rígida; Híbrido; Estrutura semirrígida; Estrutura flexível; Outro
sv: Vattenmadrasskonstruktion: Hård kant; Hybrid; Halvhård kant; Mjuk kant; Övrigt
zh-CN: 水床垫结构: 硬边; 混合; 半硬边; 软边; 其他
pl: Konstrukcja materaca wodnego: Twarda rama; Hybrydowa; Półtwarda rama; Miękka rama; Inne
bg-BG: Конструкция на воден матрак: С твърд борд; Хибриден; С полутвърд борд; С мек борд; Друго
hu: Vízmatrac szerkezete: Keménykeretes; Hibrid; Félkemény keretes; Puha keretes; Egyéb
fi: Vesipatjan rakenne: Kovareunainen; Hybridi; Puolikovareunainen; Pehmeäreunainen; Muu
de: Bauart der Wassermatratze: Hardside; Hybrid; Semi-Hardside; Softside; Sonstige
da: Konstruktion af vandmadras: Hardside; Hybrid; Semi-hardside; Softside; Andet
lt-LT: Vandens čiužinio konstrukcija: Kietojo rėmo; Hibridinis; Pusiau kieto rėmo; Minkštojo rėmo; Kita
pt-BR: Colchão de água construção: Hardside; Híbrido; Semi-hardside; Softside; Outros
tr: Su yatağı yapımı: Sert kenarlı; Hibrit; Yarı sert kenarlı; Yumuşak kenarlı; Diğer
zh-TW: 水床墊結構: 硬邊; 混合式; 半硬邊; 軟邊; 其他
ru: Конструкция водяного матраса: Жесткий каркас; Гибридный; Полужесткий каркас; Мягкий каркас; Другое
it: Realizzazione del materasso ad acqua: Hardside; Ibrido; Semi-hardside; Softside; Altro
es: Construcción del colchón de agua: Lados rígidos; Híbrido; Lados semirrígidos; Lados blandos; Otro
ro-RO: Construcția saltelei cu apă: Cu cadru rigid (Hardside); Hibridă; Cu cadru semirigid (Semi-hardside); Cu cadru moale (Softside); Altele
fr: Type de construction du matelas à eau: Cadre rigide; Hybride; Cadre semi-rigide; Cadre souple; Autre
nb: Konstruksjon av vannmadrass: Hard kant; Hybrid; Halvhard kant; Myk kant; Annet
el: Κατασκευή στρώματος νερού: Σκληρού πλαισίου (hardside); Υβριδικό; Ημίσκληρου πλαισίου; Μαλακού πλαισίου (softside); Άλλο
sl-SI: Izdelava vodne postelje: Trdi okvir (hardside); Hibrid; Poltrdi okvir (semi-hardside); Mehki okvir (softside); Drugo
cs: Konstrukce vodní matrace: S pevným rámem; Hybridní; S polopevným rámem; S měkkým rámem; Jiná
th: การก่อสร้างที่นอนน้ำ: ขอบแข็ง; ไฮบริด; ขอบกึ่งแข็ง; ขอบนุ่ม; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Konštrukcia vodného matraca: Hardside; Hybridný; Semi-hardside; Softside; Iná